Utah statutes.
39-6-53.   Trial record forwarded to convening authority.

After a trial by a military court, the record shall be forwarded to the convening authority, as reviewing authority.  Action on the record may be taken by the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding at that time, a successor in command, or by the governor.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

